Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2 LICENSE PLATES
42-3-217. Special plates - Colorado commission of Indian affairs.

The department shall issue one or more sets of special license plates to applicants under this section for passenger cars, motorcycles, or trucks that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight. The American Indian special license plate shall not be issued for motorcycles until January 1, 2007.

There is hereby established the American Indian special license plate. The department may begin issuance of such special license plate when the Rocky Mountain Indian chamber of commerce has commitments for special license plate purchases for at least two thousand special license plates and provides a list of the names and addresses of persons purchasing such plates to the department.

The Rocky Mountain Indian chamber of commerce is responsible for the costs of designing the special license plate and shall pay such costs before the license plate is produced. The design for the special license plate shall conform with standards established by the department.

A person may apply for an American Indian special license plate for a motor vehicle if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides a certificate issued by the Rocky Mountain Indian chamber of commerce confirming that such person meets the qualifications for the license plate established pursuant to this subsection (3).

The Colorado commission of Indian affairs shall establish a specific level of contribution to a scholarship fund that qualifies a person to obtain special license plates under this section and shall set appropriate qualifications in order for an applicant to receive a scholarship. The scholarship fund shall be administered by a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation selected and supervised by the Colorado commission of Indian affairs. Such scholarship shall not be awarded to an applicant unless the applicant can demonstrate that he or she is a Colorado resident and such scholarship will be used to attend an institution of higher education within Colorado. Such nonprofit organization shall issue a report to the Colorado commission of Indian affairs accounting for revenues and expenditures at least every other year.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates plus a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for each motor vehicle for issuing or replacing such license plates. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund, created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S., for allocation and expenditure as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(b), C.R.S.

On or after January 1, 2007, an applicant may apply for personalized American Indian special license plates. If the applicant complies with section 42-3-211, the department may issue such plates upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6) for personalized license plates. If the applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of American Indian special license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning such existing plates in to the department as required by the department. A person who has obtained personalized license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) to renew such plates. The fees imposed by this subsection (5) shall be in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for license plates issued pursuant to this section.

Special license plates issued under this section shall be renewed in the same manner as other license plates under section 42-3-113 or, for personalized plates, under section 42-3-211.

Source:

L. 2005:

(4) amended, p. 144, § 16, effective April 5; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1129, § 2, effective August 8.

42-3-217.5. Special plates - breast cancer awareness - retirement.

There is hereby established the breast cancer awareness special license plate. The department shall issue breast cancer special license plates to applicants for passenger cars, trucks, or motorcycles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

The department shall work with interested parties to design the breast cancer awareness special license plate. The design for the special license plate shall conform with standards established by the department.

A person may apply for a breast cancer awareness special license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates issued under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuing or replacing each such special license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund for allocation and expenditure as specified in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

In addition to the taxes and fees specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), a person applying for a new or replacement breast cancer awareness special license plate shall pay a surcharge of twenty-five dollars. A person applying on or before June 30, 2012, to renew a breast cancer awareness special license plate shall have the option to pay the twenty-five dollar surcharge but shall not be required to pay the surcharge in order to renew the special plate. On or after July 1, 2012, a person applying to renew a breast cancer awareness special license plate shall pay the twenty-five dollar surcharge required by this paragraph (c). The department shall transmit the surcharge to the state treasurer, who shall credit the surcharge to the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment fund created in section 25.5-5-308 (8)(a), C.R.S.

Any renewal of a special license plate issued under this section shall be handled in the same manner as other license plates under the provisions of section 42-3-113 or, for personalized plates, under the provisions of section 42-3-211.

An applicant may apply for personalized breast cancer awareness special plates. If the applicant complies with the requirements of section 42-3-211, the department may issue such plates upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6) for personalized license plates. If the applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of breast cancer awareness special license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6) and upon turning in such existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6) to renew such plates. The fees imposed by this subsection (5) shall be in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for breast cancer awareness special license plates.

and (7) Repealed.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 724, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(3)(b), (4), and (5) amended, p. 1511, § 70, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(7) added, p. 229, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(3)(c) added and (6) and (7) repealed, (HB 09-1164), ch. 215, pp. 972, 973, §§ 2, 3, effective May 2.

L. 2014:

(3)(c) amended, (HB 14-1045), ch. 137, p. 471, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to § 42-3-116.8 by House Bill 05-1247 were harmonized with House Bill 05-1107 and relocated to § 42-3-217.5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 09-1164, see section 1 of chapter 215, Session Laws of Colorado 2009.

42-3-218. Special plates - active and retired members of the Colorado National Guard - retirement.

The department shall issue special license plates for a passenger car or a truck that does not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight owned by an active or retired member of the Colorado National Guard, as defined in section 28-3-101 (12), C.R.S.

The special license plates must have a white background with blue lettering and must be of a design determined by the executive director of the department. The plates indicate that the owner of the motor vehicle is a member of the Colorado National Guard.

If an applicant for a Colorado National Guard license plate under this section demonstrates a physical impairment affecting mobility under the standards provided in section 42-3-204 (1), the department shall issue a Colorado National Guard license plate with an additional identifying figure, as defined in section 42-3-204 (1)(e), to indicate that the vehicle is authorized to transport a person who is eligible to use reserved parking under section 42-4-1208.

A natural person who is an active or retired member of the Colorado National Guard may use the special license plates provided for by this section.

The amount of taxes and fees for such special license plates shall be the same as the amount of taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle registration plus an additional one-time fee of twenty-five dollars. The additional fee shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the highway users tax fund for allocation and expenditure as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(b), C.R.S.

Applications for special license plates provided for in this section shall include such information as the department may require. At the time of application, the applicant shall submit a proof of eligibility form prepared by the department of military and veterans affairs verifying active or retired status. If the owner of a vehicle registered pursuant to this section ceases to be an active member of the Colorado National Guard and has not qualified for retirement from the Colorado National Guard, such person shall return the special license plates to the department upon expiration of the registration. Upon retiring from the Colorado National Guard, a person wishing to retain such special license plates shall submit a verification of retired status that is issued by the department of military and veterans affairs to establish eligibility for retention of the plates. A retired member of the Colorado National Guard is required to verify retired status only once under this section.

The executive director of the department may prepare any special forms and issue such rules as may be necessary to implement this section.

Source:

L. 2005:

(4) amended, p. 145, § 17, effective April 5; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1130, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2015:

(2) amended, (HB 15-1026), ch. 231, p. 860, § 5, effective August 5.

42-3-219. Special registration of collector's items. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1131, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(1)(a) and (3)(a) amended and (1)(c) added, p. 64, §§ 2, 3, effective August 7.

L. 2007:

(1)(b)(I) amended, p. 1462, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(10) repealed, p. 229, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 249, § 22, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section was relocated to § 42-12-301 in 2011.

42-3-220. Temporary special event license plates.

The department may issue a temporary special event license plate to a person or group of people in connection with a special event for a passenger vehicle or a truck that does not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

An applicant for a special event license plate shall submit to the department the name, date or dates, and location of the special event to which the request for the license plate is connected; the dates the license plate is needed; the quantity of license plates requested; a list of vehicle information including the vehicle identification number, make, model, and year of each vehicle; a certified letter stating that insurance coverage will be in place for each vehicle during its use for the period for which the temporary plate is issued; and any other information required by the department.

The department may determine the amount of an application fee for special event license plates and determine the fee, not to exceed twenty-five dollars, for the issuance of each temporary special event license plate. Such fee shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the license plate cash fund, created in section 42-3-301 (1).

The executive director of the department may prepare any special forms and issue any rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1133, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-117.7 as it existed prior to 2005.

42-3-221. Special plates - Denver Broncos.

Beginning January 1, 2007, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the Denver Broncos special license plate.

The Denver Broncos may design the special license plate. The design for the special license plate shall conform with standards established by the department and shall be subject to the department's approval.

A person may apply for a Denver Broncos special license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides to the department or an authorized agent a certificate, issued by the Denver Broncos Charities or a successor organization, confirming that such person has donated thirty dollars to the Denver Broncos Charities.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of each such license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized Denver Broncos special license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of Denver Broncos special license plates for the vehicle upon payment of the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6) and upon turning in such existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized Denver Broncos special license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of such personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for personalized Denver Broncos special license plates.

The Denver Broncos license plate shall be retired if three thousand plates are not issued by July 1, 2009.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 2037, § 1, effective August 7.

42-3-222. Special plates - support public education.

Beginning January 1, 2007, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, and noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the support public education special license plate.

The design for the special license plate shall conform with standards established by the department and shall be subject to the department's approval.

A person may apply for a support public education special license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides to the department or an authorized agent a certificate, issued by impact on education, inc., Colorado legacy foundation, or either entity's successor, confirming that the person has donated twenty dollars to either organization or either entity's successor. When receiving the donation, impact on education, inc., Colorado legacy foundation, or either entity's successor shall ask the donor to specify in writing which nonprofit education organization qualified under paragraph (c) of this subsection (3) should receive the moneys. Impact on education, inc., Colorado legacy foundation, or either entity's successor shall compile and provide to the donor and the department a list of organizations that the entity has verified qualify for donations under paragraph (c) of this subsection (3).

Impact on education, inc., Colorado legacy foundation, or either entity's successor shall use the moneys collected under this subsection (3) to support programs that focus on student learning in public schools located in Colorado.

Impact on education, inc., Colorado legacy foundation, or either entity's successor shall transmit the entire donation to the nonprofit education organization pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) if the organization:

Exists;

Is affiliated with a school district or the state charter institute;

Is a nonprofit entity exempt from federal income taxes pursuant to section 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended; and

Agrees to spend all of the donation on programs that focus on student learning in Colorado.

Impact on education, inc., Colorado legacy foundation, or either entity's successor shall not use the moneys collected under this subsection (3) to support political parties, candidates for public office, ballot initiatives, referenda, or any other political activities.

The amount of the taxes and fees for the support public education special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of each such license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized support public education special license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of support public education special license plates for the vehicle upon payment of the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6) and upon turning in such existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized support public education special license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6) for renewal of such personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for personalized support public education special license plates.

The department may stop issuing the support public education special license plate if three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2016. A person who was issued a support public education special license plate on or before July 1, 2016, may continue to use the plate after July 1, 2016.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1066, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2009:

(6) amended, (SB 09-175), ch. 226, p. 1027, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(3) and (6) amended, (HB 11-1236), ch. 98, p. 286, § 3, effective April 8.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 42-3-221 in House Bill 06-1404 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

42-3-223. Special plates - support the troops - retirement.

On or after July 1, 2007, the department shall issue one or more sets of support the troops special license plates to applicants under this section for passenger cars, trucks, motorcycles, and noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the United States support the troops special license plate. The plate shall conform with standards established by the department, and the plate shall feature the statement "Support The Troops".

A person may apply for and shall be issued a support the troops special license plate for a motor vehicle if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this subsection (3) and provides a certificate issued by the nonprofit organization selected by the adjutant general pursuant to subsection (4) of this section showing that the person has donated twenty-five dollars to such organization.

The amount of the taxes and fees for support the troops special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates plus a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for each motor vehicle for issuance of such license plates. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the highway users tax fund for allocation and expenditure as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(b), C.R.S.

Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue personalized support the troops special license plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of special license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning such existing plates in to the department as required by the department. A person who has obtained personalized support the troops special license plates under this paragraph (c) is required to pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of such personalized plates. The fees under this paragraph (c) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for the special license plates.

The adjutant general, appointed pursuant to section 28-3-105, C.R.S., shall select a nonprofit organization that aids veterans, active service members, and the families thereof to administer the donations collected pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The adjutant general shall select the organization in consultation with the Colorado board of veterans affairs, created in section 28-5-702, C.R.S. The organization shall use the moneys to aid veterans, active service members, and the families thereof but may keep up to seven percent of the moneys for administrative costs. The organization may use the moneys to aid veterans, active service members, and the families thereof by making grants to or selecting other nonprofit organizations to provide the aid so long as no more than seven percent of the moneys are used for administrative costs. Once an organization is selected, it shall continue to administer the funds unless good cause is shown for removal.

Special license plates issued under this section shall be renewed in the same manner as other license plates under section 42-3-113 or, for personalized plates, under section 42-3-211.

The special license plates authorized by this section shall not be renewed unless such plates have been issued for at least three thousand vehicles by July 1, 2009.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1484, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (SB 12-007), ch. 88, p. 289, § 3, effective April 6.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 42-3-221 in Senate Bill 06-080 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

42-3-224. Special plates - Colorado "Kids First".

The department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the Colorado "Kids First" special license plate. The department may stop issuing the Colorado "Kids First" special license plate if three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2016. A person who was issued a Colorado "Kids First" special license plate on or before July 1, 2016, may continue to use the plate after July 1, 2016.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-175), ch. 226, p. 1027, § 3, effective July 1, 2009.)

The Rocky Mountain research and prevention institute may design the special license plate. The design for the special license plate shall conform with standards established by the department and shall be subject to the department's approval.

A person may apply for a Colorado "Kids First" special license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides to the department or an authorized agent a certificate, issued by the Rocky Mountain research and prevention institute or a successor organization, confirming that such person meets the qualifications for the license plate established pursuant to this section.

The Rocky Mountain research and prevention institute or a successor organization may establish a specific level of contribution to a health promotion and injury prevention fund that qualifies a person to obtain special license plates under this section. Such fund shall be used to fund programs, activities, and events that help promote the health of children and prevent injury to children.

The Rocky Mountain research and prevention institute or its successor organization shall file an annual statement verifying that it is a nonprofit organization. The statement shall be filed under penalty of perjury with the department.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of each such license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized Colorado "Kids First" license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of Colorado "Kids First" license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6) and upon turning in such existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized Colorado "Kids First" license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of such personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for Colorado "Kids First" license plates.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1622, § 1, effective July 1, 2007.

L. 2009:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, (SB 09-175), ch. 226, p. 1027, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 11-1236), ch. 98, p. 287, § 4, effective April 8.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 42-3-221 in Senate Bill 06-100 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

42-3-225. Special plates - Italian-American heritage.

Beginning January 1, 2008, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the Italian-American heritage special license plate, which shall be issued to any person who pays the taxes and fees required under this section.

The department may stop issuing the Italian-American heritage special license plate if at least three thousand plates are not issued by July 1, 2016. A person who was issued an Italian-American heritage special license plate on or before July 1, 2016, may continue to use the plate after July 1, 2016.

The Italian-American heritage special license plate shall be designed:

To celebrate Italian-American heritage; and

In accordance with standards established by the department and be subject to the department's approval.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of each such license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized Italian-American heritage special license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of Colorado Italian-American heritage license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6) and upon turning in such existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized Italian-American heritage special license plates under this subsection (4) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of such personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (4) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for the Italian-American heritage special license plates.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 967, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(2)(b) amended, p. 229, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 09-175), ch. 226, p. 1028, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(2)(b) amended, (HB 11-1236), ch. 98, p. 288, § 5, effective April 8.

42-3-226. Special plates - share the road.

Beginning January 1, 2008, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the share the road special license plate. The department may stop issuing the share the road special license plate if three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2011. A person may continue to use the share the road special license plate after July 1, 2011.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-175), ch. 226, p. 1028, § 5, effective July 1, 2009.)

The design for the special license plate shall conform with standards established by the department and shall be subject to approval by Bicycle Colorado, Inc.

A person may apply for a share the road special license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides to the department or an authorized agent a certificate, issued by Bicycle Colorado, Inc., or a successor organization, confirming that such person meets the qualifications for the license plate established pursuant to this section.

Bicycle Colorado, Inc., or a successor organization, may establish a specific level of contribution to a share the road education fund that qualifies a person to obtain special license plates under this section. Such fund shall be used to fund programs, activities, and events that educate bicyclists, motorists, law enforcement, and transportation officials on the rights and responsibilities of bicycling, safely sharing the road, and reducing bicycle crashes.

Bicycle Colorado, Inc., or its successor organization, shall file with the department an annual statement verifying that it is a nonprofit organization.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of each such license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized share the road license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of share the road license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6) and upon turning in such existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized share the road license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of such personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for share the road license plates.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 2075, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2009:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, (SB 09-175), ch. 226, p. 1028, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 42-3-225 in Senate Bill 07-067 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

42-3-227. Special plates - Colorado horse development authority.

On or after January 1, 2009, the department shall issue Colorado horse development authority special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

The Colorado horse development authority may design the special license plates. The design for the special license plates shall conform with standards established by the department and shall be subject to the department's approval.

A person may apply for Colorado horse development authority special license plates if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides to the department or an authorized agent a certificate, issued by the Colorado horse development authority or a successor organization, confirming that the person has donated thirty dollars to the Colorado horse development authority.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of each such license plate. The department shall transmit the one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized Colorado horse development authority special license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such license plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of Colorado horse development authority special license plates for the vehicle upon payment of the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6) and upon turning in such existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized Colorado horse development authority special license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of the personalized license plates. The fees imposed under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for personalized Colorado horse development authority special license plates.

The department may stop issuing the Colorado horse development authority special license plate if three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2016. A person who was issued a Colorado horse development authority special license plate on or before July 1, 2016, may continue to use the plate after July 1, 2016.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 858, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(6) amended, (SB 09-175), ch. 226, p. 1028, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(6) amended, (HB 11-1236), ch. 98, p. 288, § 6, effective April 8.